Wyoming, session 2026, HB0180.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 15-7-115 is created to read:

HB0180

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0343
15-7-115. Surface water runoff and diversion systems
existing before April 1, 2026; requirements.

(a) Not later than July 1, 2027, any surface water
diversion system and any surface water runoff system
established, purchased, constructed, extended, maintained
or regulated by a city or town under W.S. 15-7-101(a)(iii)
before April 1, 2026 shall:

(i) Be reclassified as or placed within a
surface water drainage utility in accordance with the
Surface Water Drainage Utility Act, provided that the
reclassification or placement shall only be effective upon
an affirmative vote of the electors of the surface water
drainage utility area, as applicable and pursuant to W.S.
16-10-105(e); or

(ii) Operate using only funds that are held or
maintained by the city or town that established the surface
water diversion system or surface water runoff system and
that are not collected as fees or charges from the users of
the system. For purposes of this paragraph:

HB0180

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0343
(A) Any charges or fees charged or assessed
to the users of the surface water diversion system or
surface water runoff system shall be refunded in accordance
with subsection (b) of this section;

(B) A city or town operating a surface
water diversion or runoff system may impose or assess fees
or charges to the users of the system after submitting the
question of whether fees or charges may be assessed and
after approval by a majority of the electors voting on the
question. After approval by the electors under this
subparagraph, the question of the imposition of fees and
charges for a surface water diversion or runoff system
shall be submitted to the voters at each municipal election
four (4) years after the electors first approve the
imposition or assessment of system fees;

(C) Nothing in this paragraph shall be
construed to limit or prohibit the assessment and
collection and fees for other services in accordance with
law, including trash, water and sewer services.

HB0180

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0343
(b) The imposition of any charges and fees prescribed
or collected for the diversion or management of surface
water runoff under W.S. 15-7-101(a)(iii)(B) shall terminate
on April 1, 2026. If the surface water diversion or runoff
system established under W.S. 15-7-101(a)(iii) is not
reclassified or placed within a surface water drainage
utility under the Surface Water Drainage Utility Act or
does not operate in accordance with paragraph (a)(ii) of
this section by April 1, 2026, the city or town that
collected charges and fees under W.S. 15-7-101(a)(iii)(B)
shall refund all charges and fees collected before April 1,
2026 to each user of the system who paid the charges and
fees not later than September 1, 2027, subject to
subsection (c) of this section.

(c) Charges and fees collected under W.S.
15-7-101(a)(iii)(B) that were revenues pledged for the
payment of any revenue bonds issued under W.S. 15-7-102 may
be retained to repay bonds issued before April 1, 2026.

Section 2. W.S. 15-6-102 by creating a new subsection
(c), 15-7-101(a)(iii)(intro) and (B), 15-7-401 and
16-10-105(a) are amended to read:
HB0180

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0343

15-6-102. General grant of authority;
nonapplicability of other provisions; restriction;
nonexclusivity.

(c) Each city and town that completed an improvement
under this chapter before April 1, 2026 for a surface water
runoff system or surface water diversion system shall:

(i) Comply with the requirements of W.S.
15-7-115;

(ii) Not charge fees or other charges to system
users after April 1, 2026, subject to W.S. 15-7-115(a)(ii)
and (c);

(iii) Not later than July 1, 2027, either:

(A) Reclassify or place the surface water
diversion system or surface water runoff system in a
surface water drainage utility in accordance with the
Surface Water Drainage Utility Act, provided that the
reclassification or placement shall only be effective upon
HB0180

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0343
an affirmative vote of the electors of the reclassified
surface water drainage utility area pursuant to W.S.
16-10-105(e); or

(B) Operate the system in accordance with
W.S. 15-7-115(a)(ii).

(iv) Dissolve on July 1, 2027 if the system is
not reclassified or placed within a surface water drainage
utility in accordance with the Surface Water Drainage
Utility Act, this section and W.S. 15-7-115 or is not
operated in accordance with W.S. 15-7-115(a)(ii) and refund
all collected charges and fees in accordance with W.S.
15-7-115.

15-7-101. Purposes.

(a) In addition to all other powers provided by law,
any city or town may make public improvements as follows
for which bonds may be issued to the contractor or be sold
as provided in this chapter to:

HB0180

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0343
(iii) Take any action necessary to establish,
purchase, extend, maintain and regulate a water system for
supplying water to and, subject to W.S. 15-7-115, diverting
surface water runoff from its inhabitants and their
property and for any other public purposes, including:

(B) Prescribing and regulating of rates for
the use of water and, subject to W.S. 15-7-115, the
diversion or management of surface water runoff; and

15-7-401. Establishment; powers and duties generally.

(a) Any city or town which owns and operates a
municipal waterworks, a sanitary sewer system, a sewage
disposal plant or an electric utility distribution system
may establish a board of commissioners to be known as the
board of public utilities. The board of public utilities
shall manage, operate, maintain and control such plants and
make all rules and regulations necessary for their safe,
economical and efficient operation and management. The
board may also improve, extend or enlarge the plants as
provided in this article.

HB0180

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0343
(b) Each board of public utilities that has
established, constructed, operated or maintained a surface
water diversion system or a surface water runoff system
under this article or W.S. 15-7-101(a)(iii) before April 1,
2026 shall:

(i) Comply with the requirements of W.S.
15-7-115;

(ii) Not charge fees or other charges to system
users after April 1, 2026, subject to W.S. 15-7-115(a)(ii)
and (c);

(iii) Not later than July 1, 2027, either:

(A) Reclassify or place the surface water
diversion system or surface water runoff system in a
surface water drainage utility in accordance with the
Surface Water Drainage Utility Act, provided that the
reclassification or placement shall only be effective upon
an affirmative vote of the electors of the reclassified
surface water drainage utility area pursuant to W.S.
16-10-105(e); or
HB0180

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0343

(B) Operate the system in accordance with
W.S. 15-7-115(a)(ii).

(iv) Dissolve on July 1, 2027 if the system is
not reclassified or placed within a surface water drainage
utility in accordance with the Surface Water Drainage
Utility Act, this section and W.S. 15-7-115 or is not
operated in accordance with W.S. 15-7-115(a)(ii) and refund
all charges and fees in accordance with W.S. 15-7-115.

16-10-105. Ordinance or resolution for construction;
required and authorized provisions.

(a) If the governing body of a city, town or county
desires to establish a surface water drainage utility
pursuant to this act, a county shall do so by resolution
and a city or town shall do so by ordinance. The resolution
or ordinance shall provide for the administration of the
surface water drainage utility either by the governing body
of the city, town, county, joint powers board or other
board or entity selected by the applicable governing body,
including but not limited to a board of public utilities
HB0180

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0343
formed pursuant to W.S. 15-7-401 15-7-401(a). The
ordinance or resolution shall contain the specific
description of the surface water drainage area to be served
by the surface water drainage utility.

Section 3. There is appropriated five thousand
dollars ($5,000.00) from the general fund to the office of
state lands and investments for distribution to any city or
town that established a surface water diversion or runoff
system under W.S. 15-7-101(a)(iii) or 15-7-401 before the
effective date of this act that is seeking to transition
the system to a surface water drainage utility. The office
of state lands and investments shall distribute this
appropriation to cities and towns on a pro rata basis. This
appropriation shall be for the period beginning with the
effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2028. This
appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any
other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds
remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided
by law on June 30, 2028.

HB0180

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0343
Section 4. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0180